Utah statutes.
4-35-3.   Decision and Action Committee created -- Members -- How appointed
-- Duties of committee -- Per diem and expenses allowed.
(1) (a)  There is created the Decision and Action Committee which consists of
not fewer than six members.
(b)  One member is the commissioner and one member is appointed to represent
the department.
(c)  The remaining members of the committee are appointed by the commissioner
on an ad hoc basis as necessary from persons directly affected by and involved
in the current insect infestation emergency.
(d)  The committee is dissolved when the commissioner declares that the insect
infestation emergency is over.
(2)  The committee shall:
(a)  establish a system of priorities for any insect infestation emergency;
and
(b)  certify to the commissioner any area which requires the establishment of
an insect control district in areas of infestation and in which a simple
majority of the landowners and lessees whose total production exceeds 50% of
the production in that area has agreed to pay proportionate shares of the
costs of controlling the insects infesting the area.
(3) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member’s official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the committee at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
